Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 22

Governmental Waste Elimination

25-22-101 — 25-22-108. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This chapter was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 343, § 7. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

25-22-101. Acts 1987, No. 526, § 1.

25-22-103. Acts 1987, No. 526, § 5.

25-22-105. Acts 1987, No. 526, §§ 3, 5, 7.

25-22-107. Acts 1987, No. 526, § 6.

25-22-102. Acts 1987, No. 526, § 2.

25-22-104. Acts 1987, No. 526, § 3.

25-22-106. Acts 1987, No. 526, § 4.

25-22-108. Acts 1987, No. 526, § 7.